Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation, Termination, and Management.
§ 55.1-2214.
Time-share instrument for project.

In addition to the requirements of §

55.1-2208

, the time-share instrument for a time-share use program shall prescribe and outline reasonable arrangements for the management and operation of the time-share use program and for the maintenance, repair, and furnishing of time-share use units it comprises. Such arrangements shall include provisions for the following:

Standards and procedures for upkeep, repair, and interior furnishing of time-share use units, for the replacements of such furnishings, and for providing maid, cleaning, linen, and similar services to the units during use and occupancy periods;

Adoption of standards and rules of conduct governing the use, enjoyment, and occupancy of time-share use units by owners;

Payment by the developer of the costs and expenses of operating the time-share use program and owning and maintaining the time-share use units it comprises;

Selection of a managing agent to act for and on behalf of the developer should the developer elect not to undertake the duties, responsibilities, and obligations of the management of the time-share use program;

Procedures for establishing the rights of time-share use owners to occupancy, use, and enjoyment of time-share use units by prearrangement or under a first-reserved, first-served priority system;

Procedures for imposing and collecting regular or special assessments, maintenance fees, or use fees from time-share use owners as necessary to defray all time-share expenses and in providing materials and services to the units, as required of the developer in this chapter;

Comprehensive general liability insurance for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the occupancy, use, and enjoyment of time-share use units by time-share use owners, their guests, and other users. The costs associated with securing and maintaining such insurance shall be a time-share expense. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to obligate the developer to secure insurance on the conduct of the time-share use owners, their guests, and other users or the personal effects or property of such owners, guests, and users;

Methods for providing compensating or alternate use periods or monetary compensation to a time-share use owner if a time-share use unit cannot be made available for the period to which the owner is entitled by schedule or by a confirmed reservation; and

Procedures for imposing a monetary penalty or suspension of a time-share use owner’s rights and privileges in the time-share use program or project or termination of the time-share use itself for failure of the time-share use owner to (i) comply with the provisions of the time-share use instrument; (ii) comply with the rules and regulations established by the developer with respect to the occupancy, use, and enjoyment of the time-share use units; or (iii) pay the charges imposed by the developer against the time-share use owner for providing the materials and services as required of the developer in this chapter. Except in matters where the time-share use owner has failed to pay the charge imposed by the developer for a period of less than 60 days after it has become due and payable, the owner shall be given notice and the opportunity to be heard.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-371; 1985, c. 517; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2215.
Partition.

No action for partition of a unit may be maintained except as permitted by the time-share instrument or by subsection C of §

55.1-2216

.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-372; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2216.
Termination of certain time-shares.

This section applies to all time-share estate programs and, when provided by the time-share instrument, to time-share use programs.

A time-share project may be terminated in whole by the developer at any time and for any reason if such developer is the sole owner of all time-shares within the time-share project. Such termination shall be accomplished by the developer executing and recording a termination document where the time-share instrument is recorded. Time-shares subject to this section also may be terminated by written agreement of the time-share owners having at least 51 percent of the time-shares or by written agreement of such larger percentage of the time-share owners as may otherwise be provided in the time-share instrument. The termination agreement shall specify a date upon which it shall become void, unless it is recorded before that date in the clerk’s office of the appropriate court where the time-share project is located.

If the termination agreement sets forth the material terms of a contract or proposed contract under which an estate or interests equal to the sum of the time-shares are to be sold and designates a trustee to effect the sale, the termination agreement becomes effective upon recordation, and title to that estate or interest vests upon termination in the trustee for the benefit of the time-share owners, to be transferred pursuant to the contract. If the termination agreement does not set forth the material terms of a contract or proposed contract under which an estate or interests equal to the sum of the time-shares are to be sold and designates a trustee to effect the sale, the termination agreement becomes effective upon recordation, and title to an estate or interests equal to the sum of the time-shares therein vests upon termination in the time-share owners in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection F. Liens on the time-shares shall accordingly encumber the respective interests; and in this instance, any co-owner of that estate or interest may maintain an action for partition or for allotment or sale in lieu of partition pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth.

Except as otherwise specified in the termination agreement, so long as the former time-share owners or their trustee holds title to the estate or interests equal to the sum of the time-shares, each former time-share owner and his successor in interest have the same rights with respect to the use, enjoyment, and occupancy in the former time-share unit that such former time-share owner and his successor in interest would have had if termination had not occurred, together with the same liabilities and other obligations imposed by this act or the time-share instrument.

After termination of all time-shares in a time-share project and adequate provision for payment of the claims of the creditors for time-share expenses, distribution shall be made, in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection F, to the former time-share owners and their successors in interest of (i) the proceeds of any sale pursuant to this section, (ii) the proceeds of any personalty held for the use and benefit of the former time-share owners, and (iii) any other funds held for the use and benefit of the former time-share owners.

The time-share instrument may specify the respective fractional or percentage interest that will be owned by each former time-share owner after termination, in accordance with the provisions of this section. Otherwise, not more than 180 days prior to the termination, an appraisal shall be made of the fair market value of each time-share by one or more impartial qualified appraisers selected either by the trustee designated in the termination agreement or by the managing entity if no trustee was so designated. The appraisal shall also state the corresponding fractional or percentage interests calculated in proportion to those values and in accordance with this subsection. A notice stating all of those values and corresponding interests and the return address of the sender shall be sent by certified or registered mail, by the managing entity or the trustee designated in the termination agreements, to all of the time-share owners. The appraisal governs the magnitude of each interest unless (i) at least 25 percent of the time-share owners deliver, within 60 days after the date the notices were mailed, written disapprovals to the return address of the sender of the notice or (ii) the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, entered during or after that period, holds that the appraisal should be set aside. The appraisal and the calculation of interests shall be made in accordance with the following:

If the termination agreement sets forth the material terms of a contract or proposed contract for the sale of the estate or interests equal to the sum of the time-shares, each time-share conferring a right of occupancy during a limited number of time periods shall be appraised as if the time until the date specified for the conveyance of the property had already elapsed. Otherwise, each time-share of that kind shall be appraised as if the time until the date specified pursuant to subsection B had already elapsed.

The interest of each time-share owner is the value of the time-share he owned divided by the sum of the values of all time-shares in the unit or units to which his time-share applies.

Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against all of the time-shares in a time-share project does not of itself terminate those time-shares.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-373; 1985, c. 517; 2006, c. 653; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.